usr/share/hunspell/mr_IN.dic
अंथरणे/NOP
अजमावणे/NOP
अज्ञेयवाद/k
अठरा/Aacdqv&
अठ्ठावीस/Aacqv&
अठ्ठेचाळीस/Aacqv&
अडतीस/Aacqv&
अतिधोकादायक/wu
अतिसंवेदनशील/wu
अतिसामान्य/fwu
अधिक/acZdwu
अधिकारी/Z
अनारकली/Aacd
अनास्था/j
अनुग्रह/k
अनुभवणे/NOP
अनुभूती/Aacdh
अनुवादणे/NOP
अनुसरणे/NOP
अनैसर्गिक/wu
अन्नधान्यपुरवठा/e
अपडेट/AacS
अपर्याप्त/w
अपूर्वायां/Fbcd
अपेशी/Aacdh
अपोहन/k
अभक्ष्य/f
अम्लपित्त/k
अयोध्या/j
अर्चणे/NOP
अर्जणे/NOP
अर्धमेला/s
अर्धाअधिक/u
अर्पणे/NOP
अवखळ/wu
अवघड/uZ
अवतरणे/NOP
अवस/i
अव्हेर/k
अव्हेरणे/NOP
अशा/Aacdhs
अशिव/f
अश्वपरीक्षा/jh
असंस्कृत/wu
असण्याइतपत/Z
असल्याचे/Z
असून/Z
अस्ताव्यस्त/wu
अहमदाबाद/Aac
अहल्या/j
आ/FT
आंबेहळद/l
आकडेमोड/g
आकलन/k
आकाशदिवा/e
आक्रस्ताळा/s
आगळे/u
आचरणे/NOP
आच्छादणे/NOP
आज/cZ
आठ/acfqv&
आडपडदा/s
आडवणे/NOP
आणे/NTacd
आतिशबाजी/Aacd
आत्मप्रतिमा/jh
आदर/k
आदरसत्कार/f
आदला/s
आधिभौतिक/lw
आनंदप्राप्ती/Aacd
आयताकार/AacS
आयोजणे/NOP
आरंभणे/NOP
आरोपणे/NOP
आरोह/k
आर्द्रता/jh
आलतूफालतू/u
आलिंगणे/NOP
आळी/Aacd
आव/i
आवडता/s
आहुत्या/h
आहे/Z
इंग्रज/fl
इंडियन/AacS
इच्छणे/NOP
इतपत/Z
इथून/Z
इनोवेशन/Aac
इशाऱा/Fe
इश्कबाजी/Zacd
इसब/k
इस्त्रीवाला/s
इस्लामाबाद/Aacik
ईमेल/AacS
उखाळी-पाखाळी/Aacd
उघड/Zu
उघडी/acd
उचलणे/MNPQ
उचापत/g
उजळायां/Fbcd
उणिव/Fi
उतरता/s
उत्तरपूजा/jh
उत्पादित/Z
उद/k
उदात्त/wu
उदारमतवादी/ewu
उदास/wul
उद्रेक/f
उपमा/jhe
उपसंचालिका/jh
उबदार/acfu
उमदा/s
उमदेवार/fi
उलटणे/MNPQ
उलटपालट/l
उल्लेखणे/NOP
ऊर्जितावस्था/jh
एक/Zacflwqv&
एकतीस/Aacqv&
एकमत/k
एकवीस/Aacqv&
एकसंध/wu
एकांडा/s
एकात्मिक/wu
एकेकट्या/Aacd
एकेचाळीस/Aacqv&
एकोणचाळीस/Aacqv&
एकोणतीस/Aacqv&
एकोणपन्नास/Aacfqv&
एकोणवीस/Aacqv&
एकोणीस/Aacqv&
एक्केचाळीस/Aacqv&
एजंट/AacfS
ऐंशी/acdh
ओढाताण/l
ओलेत्या/acd
ओवा/s
कंगोऱा/Fe
कंड/i
कंपनी/Aacde
कंपनीसोबत/cg
कंप्युटर/AacS
कठपुतळ्या/h
कणाहीन/wu
कधी/ZAac
कपर्दिक/Fif
कपसाठी/Aacd
कफल्लक/f
कमीजास्त/Zc
कमेंट/AacS
करदाता/e
करुणगीत/fi
कर्तव्यदक्ष/wu
कलागती/Aacdh
कल्पणे/NOP
कल्याणकारी/acd
कळकळ/l
कळवळा/s
कविकल्पना/jh
कवितावाचन/k
कव्हर/AacS
कशातरी/acd
कष्टाळू/u
कातकऱी/Fe
कातर/g
कातरवेळ/i
काम/Zf
कार्ड/AacSf
कार्डबोर्ड/AacfS
काळिमा/s
काळ्या/Aacdh
काळ्याभोर/ac
किंचाळणे/MNPQ
किचकट/Zu
किडक्या/Aacd
कितीएक/acflwk
कित्येकवेळा/jh
कित्येकां/Fbcd
किलोलीटर/acf
कुंटणखाना/e
कुठल्याकुठे/Z
कुरडई/Aacd
कुऱ्हाड/g
कुल्फीवाला/s
कुसकरणे/MNPQ
कृतिशून्य/fwu
कृमी/Aacdh
कृष्णजन्म/k
केंद्रबिंदू/Aacdh
केणे/FT
कैद/i
कॉपीराइट/AacS
कोठेतरी/Z
कोड/Aacf
कोडगे/u
कोनशिला/jh
कोपिष्ट/Z
कोरड/l
कोर्टमार्शल/Aac
कोलकाता/s
कोल्हाटी/acd
क्लब/AacfS
खटाळक्यां/Fbcd
खणखणणे/MNPQ
खरज/Fi
खरेदीदार/f
खर्चणे/NOP
खवडा/e
खाट/i
खाणे/NPU
खाण्या/Aacdh
खातेफोड/fg
खादाड/flu
खाद्य/k
खानदानी/u
खापरी/Aacd
खालपर्यंत/ac
खुलवणे/NOP
खुळे/Zu
खेटणे/MNPQ
खेळपट्टी/Aacd
खोबण्यां/Fbcd
गंधाक्षत/i
गंभीर/wu
गटारगंगा/j
गडबड/l
गप्प/iu
गर्भा/s
गर्भिणी/Aacdh
गलिच्छ/wu
गस्त/g
गांधीजी/Aacdh
गाठोडे/e
गाणे/NPUe
गायणे/FT
गार/i
गार्ड/AacS
गिरदी/acd
गुंज/i
गुंतणे/MNPQ
गुटखा/s
गुणिजन/f
गुलकाड्यां/Fbcd
गुलछबू/Aacdhu
गृहरचना/jh
गृहस्थिती/Aacdh
गेणे/FT
गेस्टरूम/AacS
गोठी/acd
गोत/fi
गोशा/e
गौडसारंग/k
गौरवणे/NOP
ग्रामोफोनां/Fbcd
ग्वाह्यां/Fbcd
घडण/g
घणघण/l
घातणे/FTP
घातवार/fi
घुसणे/MNPQ
चंचल/wu
चंद्रिका/j
चंबूं/Fbcd
चटई/Aacd
चटकदार/wu
चटण्या/h
चढाओढ/g
चतुरस्र/fu
चतुर्थ/kl
चर्चणे/NOP
चर्पटपंजऱ्यां/Fbcd
चर्र/acd
चळवळीदरम्यान/c
चवथा/sx
चव्वेचाळीस/Aacqv&
चाकरमानी/e
चान्यां/Fbcd
चाळणे/MNPQ
चाळीस/Aacqv&
चिचुंदऱ्यां/Fbcd
चित्रपटकार/AacS
चिपळी/Aacd
चुक/Fil
चुकचुक/l
चुकून/Z
चुगल्याचहाड्यां/Fbcd
चुटक्या/h
चुरश/Fg
चोखंदळ/wu
चोबदारभालदारां/Fbcd
चौतीस/Aacqv&
चौऱ्याण्णव/Aacf
छत्तीस/Aacqv&
छळणे/MNPQ
छोटीछोटी/acd
जंतूनाशक/Fk
जखमा/jh
जगज्जननी/Aacd
जत्रेकऱी/Fe
जन्मपूर्व/i
जमादाऱ्यां/Fbcd
जमाव/f
जलवाहतुक/Fl
जागोजाग/cgi
जाण/i
जाणे/NPU
जातिव्यवस्था/jh
जादूटोणा/es
जित्या/acd
जिभल्यां/Fbcd
जिवंत/u
जीवनपद्धती/Aacd
जीवनमुक्त/wu
जीवनलहरी/Aacdh
जॅकेट/AacS
जेवणे/MNPQ
जोडणी/Aacd
झगमगाट/k
झाडलोट/l
झाडूवाला/e
झाणे/FT
झापड/g
झाला/s
झिज/Fi
झिडकारण्यां/Fbcd
झेलणे/MNPQ
झोटिंगशाह्यां/Fbcd
झोपडपट्टी/Aacd
टवाळी/Aacd
टायर/AacS
टेर/i
ट्रॅक/AacS
ठसकेदार/f
ठाकठोक/l
ठिय्यां/Fbcd
ठेला/e
ठेवणे/MNOPQ
ठोकळेबाज/u
डिंगऱ्यां/Fbcd
डुक्करमुसंडी/acd
डेबिटकार्ड/AacfS
डोंगरवाटा/jh
ढकल/g
ढकलणे/MNPQ
ढुमण्यां/Fbcd
तंबाखूविरोधी/acd
तटिनीं/Fbcd
तनुजा/jh
तळतळ/l
तशी/Z
तसद्यां/Fbcd
तहशीलदाऱ्यां/Fbcd
तहसीलदाऱ्यां/Fbcd
तहान/i
ताणा/e
तापट/wu
तापणे/MNPQ
ताबा/s
तिडक/Fg
तिनं/Z
तीन/Aacqv&
तीव्र/wu
तीस/Aacqv&
तेरा/acdqv&
तेवीस/Aacqv&
तेहेतीस/Aacqv&
तोंडल्यां/Fbcd
तोल/k
त्यजणे/NOP
त्यांचा/Ze
त्याची/Z
त्रिसूत्री/Aacd
त्रेचाळीस/Aacqv&
त्रेधातिरपिट/Fl
त्रेपन्न/fAac
थंडगार/i
थाऱा/Fs
थुंकणे/MNPQ
थोडे/Z
थोरथोर/wu
दरवेशी/e
दरसाल/cfg
दराऱा/Fs
दलाली/Aacd
दहा/Aacdhqv&
दांडगाई/Aacd
दांभिकता/j
दाणावैरण/l
दाण्यां/Fbcd
दिणे/FT
दिमडी/acd
दीपमाळा/jh
दुराग्रही/u
दुर्दैव/fwu
दुर्लौकिक/k
देणे/NPUe
देशमुख/Aacf
दोन/Aacfqv&
दौलत/l
धडाड्यां/Fbcd
धत्तुऱा/Fe
धनगरक्यां/Fbcd
धर्मविद्या/j
धांगडधिंगा/s
धात्रीं/Fbcd
धावडणे/MNPQ
धुणावळ/g
धुणे/PQUe
धुतणे/FTP
धुळवड/l
धुव्वा/s
धूळमाती/Aacd
धोकट्यां/Fbcd
ध्यानभंग/k
नऊ/Aacqv&
नऊवार/fi
नकला/jh
नरम/wu
नरोटी/acd
नवशिका/e
नव्वद्यां/Fbcd
नष्टचर्य/f
नसताना/Z
नागमोडी/u
नायटा/s
निंदा/j
निखळ/wu
निजरूप/k
नितंबिनीं/Fbcd
नियतीवादी/Acadhe
निर्धोक/u
निर्मळ/wu
निर्यातदार/acf
निर्वाळा/s
निळ/Fl
निस्तरणे/MNPQ
नेणे/NPUe
नैर्ऋत्य/i
नॉव्हेल/AacS
नोव्हेंबर/Aacf
न्यायनिर्णय/f
पंचपात्र्यां/Fbcd
पंचवीस/Aacqv&
पंचेचाळीस/Aacqv&
पंधरा/acdqv&
पंधरां/Fbcd
पंधरावीस/Aacq
पक्वता/jh
पक्षनिरपेक्ष/wu
पक्षविरोधी/acd
पक्षशिस्त/g
पट्टा/e
पदच्युत/k
परदारा/jh
परमात्मा/s
परिवर्तनशील/wu
पर्णकुटी/Aacd
पलायन/f
पस्तीस/Aacqv&
पाजण्यां/Fbcd
पाठराखण/l
पाठवणे/NOP
पाडणे/MNPQ
पात/g
पान्हा/s
पापण्यां/Fbcd
पायऱ्या/h
पारखी/e
पालवी/Aacd
पिठीसाखर/i
पिणे/PU
पिळणे/MPQ
पिशाच्यां/Fbcd
पुत्रप्राप्ती/Aacd
पुनःस्थापना/j
पुनर्निर्माण/k
पुरी/acd
पूर्वभाग/f
पॅकेट/AacS
पोक्त/wu
पोटतिडक/Fg
पोवळे/e
प्यायणे/FT
प्रबलता/j
प्रभू/Aacdh
प्रसिद्ध/l
प्राणिमात्र/f
प्रातःकाल/k
प्रौढ/fwu
प्लांट/AacS
फटफजिती/Aacd
फसणे/MNPQ
फाईल/AacS
फार/Z
फुणफुण/l
फेरीअखेर/acdg
फोन/AacS
बँक/AacifS
बंगला/e
बंडा/Fs
बजावणे/NOP
बत्तीस/Aacqv&
बनणे/MNPQ
बरगडी/Aacd
बसस्टँड/Aac
बहुविध/wu
बांगा/jh
बाऊं/Fbcd
बाकीच्या/h
बाटणुक/Fl
बायोगॅस/Aac
बालहक्क/f
बावीस/Aacqv&
बिनसणे/MNPQ
बिहार/Aacg
बुक्का/e
बूट/AacfS
बेडी/Aacd
बेफाम/wu
बेरिअम/k
बोजवाऱा/Fs
ब्लॉग/AacS
भक्ती/Aacd
भडक/wu
भसाड्या/Aacd
भाकरतुकडा/e
भागाभाग/l
भाज्या/Aacdh
भारतभर/g
भावनाशून्य/fwu
भिडणे/MPQ
भिणे/PU
भितरे/u
भूतबाधा/j
भूषवणे/NOP
भेकड/wu
भ्यायणे/FT
मंत्री/meY
मणिकांचन/k
मध्यपूर्व/i
मरगळ/l
मरण/f
मल्लिका/jh
मवाली/eu
मशाल/g
मस्ती/Aacd
महाभयानक/w
महारथी/Aacdh
महोदया/jh
माई/Aacdh
माखणे/MNPQ
माटुंगा/s
मादक/wu
मारण्याइतपत/Z
मार्केट/AacS
माळिण/Fg
मिठाश/Fl
मित्रपरिवार/k
मुक्तिसंग्राम/f
मूर्च्छा/jh
मृत्यूदाखला/e
मेणे/FT
मैत्रिणीसोबत/cg
मॉडेल/AacS
मोदी/Aacdh
मोरया/Aacd
मोहणे/MNPQ
म्हणाणे/FNT
यमदेव/fwu
यमुना/j
यांनी/Z
युद्धशैली/Aacdh
येणे/NPUe
येथून/Z
रक्षक/f
रणरण/l
रपाटा/e
रसिक/fwu
राखा/jh
राजभवन/k
रात्र/g
राबणे/MNPQ
राष्ट्रमाता/jh
राहणे/NOPQ
रुपया/Aacdh
रेकॉर्ड/AacS
रेडिओ/Aacdh
रोचक/wu
लगबग/l
लघुसंदेश/f
लपणे/MNPQ
लव/fi
लांबणे/MNPQT
लाखा/jh
लागवड/g
लेकुरवाळा/e
लेणे/PUe
लोकभावना/jh
लोळणे/MNPQ
ल्यायणे/FT
वक्तृत्वशैली/Aacdh
वनखाता/Fs
वर्कशॉप/Aac
वर्धमान/k
वर्षांअखेर/acdg
वल्कल/f
वसत्या/h
वसाहतवादी/Acadhe
वाढ/l
वाढणे/MNPQ
वार्ता/jh
वावदूक/u
वास्तव/kw
वाहणे/NOP
विघटनवादी/Acadhe
विणे/PU
विद्युद्दीप/f
विभागण्या/h
विलायत/i
विवाहयोग्य/wu
विसंगत/g
वीरबाला/jh
वीस/Aacqv&
वृद्धापकाळ/k
वेगळा/Z
वेटर/AacS
वैचित्र्य/f
वैद्यकशास्त्रीय/wu
व्यक्त/u
व्याकरणशास्त्री/Aacdh
व्यायणे/FT
शपथविधी/Aacdh
शब्दकळा/h
शरीरयंत्रणा/jh
शासनाधिकाऱी/Fe
शिजणे/MPQ
शिमट्यां/Fbcd
शिवकुमार/f
शिवरात्र/g
शिष्टमान्य/w
शुभप्रभात/ik
शेजारचा/s
शेतीसुधारणा/jh
शेषशायी/Aacdh
शेहेचाळीस/Aacqv&x
श्रीधर/k
श्रीमंत/fl
षट्कार/AacS
संघर्षण/f
संचारबंदी/Aacd
संपूर्ण/wu
संस्थापणे/NOP
सज्जन/fwu
सणकणे/MNPQ
सतरा/Aacdhqv&
सत्ताधिकाऱी/Fe
सत्तावीस/Aacqv&
सत्तेचाळीस/Aacqv&
सत्यनिष्ठा/j
सदतीस/Aacqv&
सनया/h
समजुत/Fg
समर्पणशील/f
समाजशील/w
सरकारविरोधी/acd
सर्व/Z
सर्वकाळ/ck
सलग/wu
सव्वीस/Aacqv&
सहा/Aacdhqv&
साठवण/g
सात/acfqv&
साध्वी/Aacdh
साहित्यप्रकार/cf
सीक्वेल/Aac
सुकाणू/Aacdh
सुखसोहळा/e
सुजाण/wu
सुधा/j
सुसंघटित/wu
सृष्टिसौंदर्य/kf
सेव्हिंग/AacS
सेहेचाळीस/Aacqv&
सैलसर/fg
सोडवणे/NOP
सोळा/Aacdhqv&
सोसणे/MNPQ
स्टॉप/AacS
स्ट्राँगरूम/AacS
स्थानबल/f
स्थापन/i
स्वभावविशेष/fwu
स्वातंत्र्यलढा/s
स्वातंत्र्यवादी/Acadhe
स्वेच्छा/jh
हँगर/AacS
हगवण/l
हटवणे/MNOP
हनवटी/Aacd
हलवणे/NOP
हवापालट/g
हवामानशास्त्रीय/wu
हालणे/MNPQ
हिरमोड/f
हिसका/e
हे/Z
होणे/NPU
होलसेल/AacS
हौतात्म्य/k
